Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6689XS (3) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2397 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 22B.1 Protection of consumer health 1 information ââ public agencies. 2 1. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âHealth informationâ means the same as defined in 45 5 C.F.R. Â§160.103. 6 b. âPublic agencyâ means the same as defined in section 7 22A.1. 8 2. A public agency shall not purchase or otherwise seek to 9 collect health information from an entity that is not subject 10 to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 11 Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, and regulations promulgated 12 under the Act, regardless of whether the entity has secured 13 approval from an individual to share the individualâs health 14 information. 15